Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1995
Prohibition of rebate and fee splitting.

A title insurer or other person shall not provide or receive, directly or indirectly, any consideration for the referral of title insurance business or escrow or other services provided by a title insurer.

Laws 1997, LB 53, § 18.